Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.120

Directors, committees—Actions authorized without meetings—Written consent.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, any action required by this title to be taken at a meeting of the directors of a state trust company, or any action which may be taken at any meeting of the directors or of a committee, may be taken without a meeting if consented to in writing or by electronic transmission, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by all of the directors, or all of the members of the committee, as the case may be. Such consent has the same effect as a unanimous vote.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term "electronic transmission" means any form of communication not involving the transmission of paper that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such recipient through an automated process.

[ 2014 c 37 s 358.]